Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-911
Retirement system; emeritus member; retirement, when.

Any emeritus member may retire upon his or her application to the retirement board, to be effective upon the termination of his or her employment in any public school or in any position covered by the retirement system.

Laws 1953, c. 315, § 3, p. 1046;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1509.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 546;

Laws 2000, LB 1192, § 13.